Nevada, session 83, SB235.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 and 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. NRS 502.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.150 1. [Whenever] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 4, whenever tags are required for any species of wildlife,
it is unlawful to have any of that species in possession without the
correct tag. Before transporting any species of wildlife, or parts
thereof, for which a tag is required, the holder of:
(a) A paper tag must attach the tag to the animal; or
(b) An electronic tag must validate the tag in accordance with
the regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to
NRS 502.160.
 Possession of any species of wildlife, or parts thereof, for which a
tag is required without an attached or validated tag, as applicable, is
prima facie evidence that the game is illegally taken and possessed.
2. It is unlawful to remove any tag from any wildlife for reuse
or to be in possession of excess tags or used tags.
3. Whenever tags are required for any species of fur-bearing
mammal, possession of a pelt of that species without the tag
attached thereto or validated, as applicable, is prima facie evidence
that such pelt is illegally taken and possessed.
4. A person may, for non-commercial purposes and without
obtaining the required tag, take shed antlers or a skull or head,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
with or without antlers or horns attached, or bones from the
carcass of any species of wildlife for which a tag is required if
such a part of the carcass is exposed, dry bone resulting from
natural processes, including, without limitation, scavenging,
decomposition or weathering.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)